Utah statutes.
76-9-1006.   Enforcement of federal immigration laws.

A state or local governmental agency of this state, or any representative of the agency, may not:

(1)  limit or restrict by ordinance, regulation, or policy the authority of any law enforcement agency or other governmental agency to assist the federal government in the enforcement of any federal law or regulation governing immigration; or

(2)  limit or restrict by ordinance, regulation, or policy the authority of any law enforcement agency to investigate or enforce any violation of the federal misdemeanor offenses of willful failure to register as an alien or willful failure to personally possess an alien registration document as required by 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1304(e) or 1306(a).

